Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2087YC (3) 91 da/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 359A.1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 359A.1 Definitions. 3 As used in this chapter , unless the context otherwise 4 requires , âbookâ , : 5 1. âBookâ , âlistâ , ârecordâ , or âscheduleâ kept by a county 6 auditor, assessor, treasurer, recorder, sheriff, or other 7 county officer means the county system as defined in section 8 445.1 . 9 2. âOwnerâ includes but is not limited to the department of 10 natural resources, if the department is the titleholder of a 11 tract of land where a partition fence is erected or required to 12 be maintained under this chapter. 13 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 456A.39 Partition fences. 14 The department of natural resources shall have the same 15 rights and obligations as any private landowner when erecting 16 and maintaining a partition fence under chapter 359A. 17